Vermont, session 2025-2026, H813.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 16 V.S.A. § 165 is amended to read:
§ 165. EDUCATION QUALITY STANDARDS; EQUAL EDUCATIONAL
OPPORTUNITIES; INDEPENDENT SCHOOL MEETING
EDUCATION QUALITY STANDARDS
(a) In order to carry out Vermont’s policy that all Vermont children will be
afforded educational opportunities that are substantially equal in quality, each
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 3 of 20
Vermont public school, including each career technical center, and each
approved independent school shall meet the following education quality
standards:
(1) The school, through a process including parents, teachers, students,
and community members, develops, implements, and annually updates a
continuous improvement plan to improve student performance within the
school. The plan shall include goals and objectives for improved student
learning and educational strategies and activities to achieve its goals. The plan
shall also address the effectiveness of efforts made since the previous
continuous improvement plan to ensure the school maintains a safe, orderly,
civil, and positive learning environment that is free from harassment, hazing,
and bullying. The school shall assess student performance under the plan
using a method or methods of assessment developed under subdivision 164(9)
of this title.
(2) The school, at least annually, reports student performance results to
community members in a format selected by the school board or governing
body of an approved independent school. In the case of a regional career
technical center, the community means the school districts in the service
region. The school report shall include:
(A) Information indicating progress toward meeting standards from
the most recent measure taken.
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 4 of 20
(B) [Repealed.]
(C) Information indicating progress toward meeting the goals of an
annual continuous improvement plan.
(D) Any other statistical information about the school or community
that the school board or governing body deems necessary to place student
performance results in context.
(E)–(G) [Repealed.]
(H) A description of how the school ensures that each student
receives appropriate career counseling and program information regarding
availability of education and apprenticeship program offerings at career
technical centers.
(I) [Repealed.]
(J) If the school is a secondary school, information and supporting
data presented in a manner designed to protect student confidentiality on the
dropout and graduation rates.
(K) Data provided by the Secretary that enable a comparison with
other schools, or school districts if school level data are not available, for cost-
effectiveness. The Secretary shall establish which data are to be included
pursuant to this subdivision and, notwithstanding that the other elements of the
report are to be presented in a format selected by the school board or governing
body, shall develop a common format to be used by each school in presenting
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 5 of 20
the data to community members. The Secretary shall provide the most recent
data available to each school no later than on or before October 1 of each year.
Data to be presented include student-to-teacher ratio, administrator-to-student
ratio, administrator-to-teacher ratio, and cost per pupil.
(3) The school substantially meets standards adopted by rule of the State
Board regarding conditions, practices, and resources of schools. The standards
shall address those aspects of the following that are most closely associated
with improving student performance:
(A) school leadership, staffing, and support services;
(B) instructional practices and curriculum leadership, content, and
coordination;
(C) educational materials and school facilities; and
(D) access to current technology.
(4) The school shall provide for and the staff shall use needs-based
professional development designed to improve the quality of education
provided to the students and directly connected to standards for student
performance established by the State Board and any other educational
performance goals established by the school board or governing body.
(5) The school uses staff evaluation to advance educational performance
objectives.
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 6 of 20
(6) The school ensures that students receive appropriate career
counseling and program information regarding the availability of education
and apprenticeship program offerings at career technical centers. In addition,
the school, if it is a secondary school, offers a genuine opportunity to access
career technical education programs.
(7) The school ensures that students are furnished educational services
in accordance with any State or federal entitlements and in a nondiscriminatory
manner.
(8) The school maintains a safe, orderly, civil, and positive learning
environment that is free from hazing, harassment, and bullying, and is based on
sound instructional and classroom management practices and clear discipline
policies that are consistently and effectively enforced.
(9) The school complies with average class size minimum standards;
provided, however, that when class size minimums apply to content areas, an
individual class may be smaller than the minimum average. As used in this
subdivision, “content area” means a group of courses within a specific
licensing endorsement area.
(A) Class size standards.
(i) The average class size minimum for first-grade classes shall be
10 students.
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 7 of 20
(ii) The average class size minimum for grades two through five
shall be 12 students.
(iii) The average class size minimum for grades six through eight
in all required content areas shall be 15 students.
(iv) The average class size minimum for grades nine through 12 in
all required content area classes shall be 18 students.
(v) Multiage classrooms for grades kindergarten through eight
shall be limited to two grade levels per classroom.
(vi) Prekindergarten, kindergarten, career and technical education,
flexible pathways, terminal courses, advanced placement courses, courses that
require specialized equipment, and driver’s education classes shall be excluded
from the class size minimum requirements in this subdivision (9). Small group
services for the purpose of providing special education, supplemental or
targeted academic intervention, or English learner instruction shall also be
excluded from the class size minimum requirements in this subdivision (9).
(vii) Class sizes shall not exceed the maximum occupancy limits
established by local and State fire codes, including egress and safety
requirements.
(B) Waivers. If a school board or governing body of an approved
independent school determines that it operates a school that is unable to
comply with the class size minimum standards due to geographic isolation, or a
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 8 of 20
school has developed an implementation plan to meet the standards contained
in this subdivision (9) that may include consolidation or merger, the school
board or governing body may ask the State Board of Education to grant it
waiver from this subdivision (9). The State Board shall define what qualifies
as geographic isolation in its rules adopted pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) of
this section. The State Board’s decision shall be final.
(C) State Board action. If the Secretary determines that a school is
not meeting the class size minimum standards set forth in this subdivision (9)
over the course of three consecutive school years, the Secretary may
recommend to the State Board one or more of the actions listed in subsection
(b) of this section, regardless of whether the school is meeting all other
education quality standards. The State Board shall then follow the procedure
of subsection (c) of this section.
(b) Annually, the Secretary shall determine whether students in each
Vermont public school and each approved independent school are provided
educational opportunities substantially equal to those provided in other public
and approved independent schools. If the Secretary determines that a school is
not meeting the education quality standards listed in subsection (a) of this
section or that the school is making insufficient progress in improving student
performance in relation to the standards for student performance set forth in
subdivision 164(9) of this title, the Secretary shall describe in writing actions
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 9 of 20
that a district or governing body must take in order to meet either or both sets
of standards and shall provide technical assistance to the school. If the school
fails to meet the standards or make sufficient progress within two years
following the determination, the Secretary shall recommend to the State Board
one or more of the following actions:
(1) the Agency continue to provide technical assistance for one more
cycle of review;
(2) in the case of a public school, the State Board adjust supervisory
union boundaries or responsibilities of the superintendency pursuant to section
261 of this title;
(3) in the case of a public school, the Secretary assume administrative
control of an individual school, school district, or supervisory union, including
budgetary control to ensure sound financial practices, only to the extent
necessary to correct deficiencies;
(4) in the case of a public school, the State Board close an individual
school or schools and require that the school district pay tuition to another
public school or an approved independent school pursuant to chapter 21 of this
title; or
(5) in the case of a public school, the State Board require two or more
school districts to consolidate their governance structures; or
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 10 of 20
(6) in the case of an approved independent school, the State Board
revoke the school’s approval.
(c) The State Board, after offering the school board or governing body of
an approved independent school an opportunity for a hearing, shall either
dismiss the Secretary’s recommendation or order that one or more of the
actions listed in subsection (b) of this section be taken, as applicable. The
action ordered by the State Board shall be the least intrusive consistent with the
need to provide students attending the school substantially equal educational
opportunities. A school board or governing body aggrieved by an order of the
State Board may appeal the order in accordance with the Rules of Civil
Procedure.
(d) Nothing in this section shall be construed to entitle any student to
educational programs or services identical to those received by students in the
same or any other school district or approved independent school. Further,
nothing in this section shall create a private right of action.
(e) If the Secretary determines at any time that the failure of a school to
meet the education quality standards listed in subsection (a) of this section is
severe or pervasive, potentially results in physical or emotional harm to
students or significant deprivation of equal education opportunities, and the
school has either unreasonably refused to remedy the problem or its efforts
have proved ineffective, the Secretary may recommend to the State Board one
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 11 of 20
or more of the actions listed in subsection (b) of this section, as applicable.
The State Board shall then follow the procedure of subsection (c) of this
section.
(f) In order to be designated an independent school meeting education
quality standards, an independent school shall participate in the education
quality standards process of subsection (b) of this section. An independent
school shall receive technical assistance in accordance with the provisions of
subsection (b), but shall not be subject to subdivisions (b)(2)-(4) of this
section. The school shall be an independent school meeting education quality
standards unless the State Board, after opportunity for hearing, finds that:
(1) the school has discontinued its participation in the education quality
standards process; or
(2) two or more years following a determination that the school is not
meeting the education quality standards or that the school is making
insufficient progress in improving student performance, the school fails to
meet the standards or make sufficient progress toward meeting the standards.
[Repealed.]
(g) In addition to the education quality standards provided in subsection (a)
of this section, each Vermont school district shall meet the school district
quality standards adopted by rule of the Agency of Education regarding the
business, facilities management, and governance practices of school districts.
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 12 of 20
These standards shall include a process for school district quality reviews to be
conducted by the Agency of Education. Annually, the Secretary shall publish
metrics regarding the outcomes of school district quality reviews.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 166 is amended to read:
§ 166. APPROVED AND RECOGNIZED INDEPENDENT SCHOOLS
(a) Authority. An independent school may operate and provide elementary
education or secondary education if it is either approved or recognized as set
forth in this section.
(b) Approved independent schools. On application, the State Board shall
approve an independent school that offers elementary or secondary education
if it finds, after opportunity for hearing, that the school provides a minimum
course of study pursuant to section 906 of this title meets education quality
standards pursuant to section 165 of this chapter and that it substantially
complies with all statutory requirements for approved independent schools and
the Board’s rules for approved independent schools. An independent school
that intends to accept public tuition shall be approved by the State Board only
on the condition that the school agrees, notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, to enroll any student who requires special education services
and who is placed in or referred to the approved independent school as an
appropriate placement and least restrictive environment for the student by the
student’s individualized education program team or by the local education
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 13 of 20
agency; provided, however, that this requirement shall not apply to an
independent school that limits enrollment to students who are on an
individualized education program or a plan under Section 504 of the
Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. § 794, and who are enrolled pursuant to
a written agreement between the local education agency and the school.
Except as provided in subdivision (6) of this subsection, the Board’s rules must
at minimum require that the school have the resources required to meet its
stated objectives, including financial capacity, faculty who are qualified by
training and experience in the areas in which they are assigned, and physical
facilities and special services that are in accordance with any State or federal
law or regulation. Approval may be granted without State Board evaluation in
the case of any school accredited by a private, State, or regional agency
recognized by the State Board for accrediting purposes, provided that the State
Board shall determine that the school complies with all student enrollment
provisions required by law.
* * *
(5) The State Board may revoke, suspend, or impose conditions upon
the approval of an approved independent school, after having provided an
opportunity for a hearing, for substantial failure to comply with the minimum
course of study education quality standards, for failure to demonstrate that the
school has the resources required to meet its stated objectives, for failure to
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 14 of 20
comply with statutory requirements or the Board’s rules for approved
independent schools, or for failure to report under subdivision (4) of this
subsection (b). Upon that revocation or suspension, students required to attend
school who are enrolled in that school shall become truant unless they enroll in
a public school, an approved or recognized independent school, or a home
study program.
* * *
(8)(A) If an approved independent school experiences any of the
following financial reporting events during the period of its approved status,
the school shall notify the Secretary of Education within five days after its
knowledge of the event unless the failure is de minimis:
(i) the school’s failure to file its federal or State tax returns when
due, after permissible extension periods have been taken into account;
(ii) the school’s failure to meet its payroll obligations as they are
due or to pay federal or State payroll tax obligations as they are due;
(iii) the school’s failure to maintain required retirement
contributions;
(iv) the school’s use of designated funds for nondesignated
purposes;
(v) the school’s inability to fully comply with the financial terms
of its secured installment debt obligations over a period of two consecutive
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 15 of 20
months, including the school’s failure to make interest or principal payments
as they are due or to maintain any required financial ratios;
(vi) the withdrawal or conditioning of the school’s accreditation
on financial grounds by a private, State, or regional agency recognized by the
State Board for accrediting purposes; or
(vii) the school’s insolvency, as defined in 9 V.S.A. § 2286(a).
(B)(i) If the Secretary reasonably believes that an approved
independent school lacks financial capacity to meet its stated objectives during
the period of its approved status, then the Secretary shall notify the school in
writing of the reasons for this belief and permit the school a reasonable
opportunity to respond.
(ii) If the Secretary, after having provided the school a reasonable
opportunity to respond, does not find that the school has satisfactorily
responded or demonstrated its financial capacity, the Secretary may establish a
review team that, with the consent of the school, includes a member of the
Council of Independent Schools, to:
(I) conduct a school visit to assess the school’s financial
capacity;
(II) obtain from the school such financial documentation as the
review team requires to perform its assessment; and
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 16 of 20
(III) submit a report of its findings and recommendations to the
State Board.
(iii) If the State Board concludes that an approved independent
school lacks financial capacity to meet its stated objectives during the period of
its approved status, the State Board may take any action that is authorized by
this section.
(iv) In considering whether an independent school lacks financial
capacity to meet its stated objectives during the period of its approved status
and what actions the State Board should take if it makes this finding, the State
Board may consult with, and draw on the analytical resources of, the Vermont
Department of Financial Regulation.
(C) Information provided by an independent school under this
subsection that is not already in the public domain is exempt from public
inspection and copying under the Public Records Act and shall be kept
confidential.
(9)(A) In addition to complying with all other statutory requirements for
approved independent schools and the Board’s rules for approved independent
schools, in order to be approved by the State Board, a school shall:
(i) adopt and implement a comprehensive plan for responding to
student misbehavior, as required pursuant to section 1161a of this title, which
includes due process procedures for suspension or expulsion that offer the
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 17 of 20
same level of due process as the public school or schools operated by the
school district within which the approved independent school is physically
located;
(ii) maintain an open enrollment policy for publicly tuitioned
students and shall not use an admissions process for publicly tuitioned students
that includes interviews, entrance exams, academic history, required campus
visits, or consideration of ability to pay for any costs or fees;
(iii) hold meetings of its governing body in accordance with
Vermont’s Open Meeting Law pursuant to 1 V.S.A. chapter 5, subchapter 2;
(iv) agree that for the purposes of access to public records, the
school is a public agency and shall comply with the provisions of 1 V.S.A.
chapter 5, subchapter 3;
(v) establish and maintain a system for receipt, deposit,
disbursement, accounting, control, and reporting procedures that meets the
criteria established by the State Board pursuant to subdivision 164(15) of this
title and that ensures that all payments are lawful and in accordance with a
budget adopted or amended by the governing body of the school;
(vi) establish with the advice and consent of the Auditor of
Accounts and the Secretary of Education a system of accounts for the proper
control and reporting of the finances of the school and for stating the annual
financial condition of the school;
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 18 of 20
(vii) prepare and distribute to the Agency of Education and the
school board of each district that pays tuition to the school pursuant chapter 21
of this title a proposed annual budget that includes the information required
under subdivision 563(11)(C) of this title;
(viii) keep the school buildings and grounds in good repair,
suitably equipped, insured, and in safe and sanitary conditions at all times;
(ix) regulate or prohibit firearms or other dangerous or deadly
weapons on school premises by, at a minimum, adopting and implementing a
policy at least consistent with section 1166 of this title and 13 V.S.A. § 4004,
relating to a student who brings a firearm to or possesses a firearm at school;
(x) adopt and implement a truancy policy that addresses
communication with sending school districts and aligns with the requirements
of chapter 25, subchapter 3 of this title;
(xi) employ or contract with licensed special educators to meet the
needs of enrolled students;
(xii) employ or contract with a licensed school nurse consistent
with the requirements contained within Rule 2121.2.1 of the Agency of
Education, Education Quality Standards (CVR 22-000-003);
(xiii) agree not to charge publicly tuitioned students any fees or
additional tuition above the amount received by the school from the student’s
school district of residence pursuant to chapter 21 of this title; and
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 19 of 20
(xiv) recognize and bargain in good faith with teachers’ and
administrators’ organizations by complying with the provisions of chapter 57
of this title.
(B) No private right of action is created by this subdivision (9)
against an approved independent school approved by the State Board for
failure to comply with any of the requirements in this subdivision (9). The
State Board is authorized to use its powers under subdivision (5) of this
subsection (b) to revoke, suspend, or impose conditions on the eligibility of an
approved independent school for failure to comply with these requirements.
The Board shall establish and maintain a process to receive, investigate, and
resolve allegations of noncompliance with these requirements in a manner that
provides due process for the person or persons making the allegation and the
approved independent school against which the allegation is made. A person
shall not coerce, threaten, interfere with, or otherwise discriminate against any
individual who alleges noncompliance with the requirements under this
subdivision (9).
* * *
(g) Tuition students; assessments. An approved independent school that
accepts students for whom the district of residence pays tuition under chapter
21 of this title shall use the assessment or assessments required under
subdivision 164(9) of this title to measure attainment of standards for student
VT LEG #385828 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.813
2026 Page 20 of 20
performance of those students. In addition, the school shall provide data
related to the assessment or assessments as required by the Secretary.
Sec. 3. STATE BOARD OF EDUCATION; RULEMAKING
On or before January 1, 2027, the State Board of Education shall initiate
rulemaking to amend the approved independent school rule 2200 series,
Agency of Education, Independent School Program Approval (22-000-004),
pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, to ensure compliance and consistency with
this act.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385828 v.2